th: รวมอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเตาผิง: ชุดเครื่องมือประกอบ; เหล็กเขี่ยไฟ; หัวปรับแรงดันแก๊ส; ลูกปัดแก้ว; ตะแกรงย่าง; หินลาวา; ตะแกรงวางฟืน; สายก๊าซโพรเพน; ตะแกรงกันประกายไฟ; ผ้าคลุมกันแดดกันฝน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за огнище: Комплект инструменти за сглобяване; Ръжен; Газов регулатор; Стъклени топчета; Скара за печене; Лава камъни; Скара за дърва; Маркуч за пропан; Предпазна мрежа срещу искри; Покривало за защита от атмосферни влияния; Други
cs: Včetně příslušenství k ohništi: Montážní sada nářadí; Pohrabáč; Regulátor plynu; Skleněné korálky; Grilovací rošt; Lávové kameny; Rošt na polena; Hadice na propan; Ochranné síto proti jiskrám; Ochranný obal proti počasí; Jiné
zh-CN: 包括火坑配件: 组装工具包; 拨火棍; 燃气调节器; 玻璃珠; 烤架网; 火山岩; 柴排; 丙烷软管; 防火星网罩; 防风雨罩; 其他
pt-BR: Acessórios para fogueira incluídos: Kit de ferramentas de montagem; Atiçador de fogo; Regulador de gás; Pedras de vidro; Grelha; Pedras vulcânicas; Suporte para lenha; Mangueira de propano; Tela contra faíscas; Capa de proteção contra intempéries; Outros
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ εστίας φωτιάς: Κιτ εργαλείων συναρμολόγησης; Σκαλιστήρι; Ρυθμιστής αερίου; Γυάλινες χάντρες; Σχάρα ψησίματος; Πέτρες λάβας; Σχάρα για κούτσουρα; Εύκαμπτος σωλήνας προπανίου; Προστατευτικό για σπίθες; Κάλυμμα παντός καιρού; Άλλο
en: Fire pit accessories included: Assembly tool kit; Fire poker; Gas regulator; Glass beads; Grill grate; Lava rocks; Log grate; Propane hose; Spark screen; Weather cover; Other
ru: Аксессуары для костровой чаши: Набор инструментов для сборки; Кочерга; Газовый регулятор; Стеклянные шарики; Решетка-гриль; Лавовые камни; Колосник для дров; Пропановый шланг; Искрозащитный экран; Погодный чехол; Другое
sk-SK: Vrátane príslušenstva k ohnisku: Súprava montážneho náradia; Kutáč; Regulátor plynu; Sklenené perly; Grilovací rošt; Lávové kamene; Rošt na polená; Propánová hadica; Lapač iskier; Kryt proti počasiu; Iné
fr: Accessoires pour foyer d'extérieur inclus: Kit d’outils d’assemblage; Tisonnier; Régulateur de gaz; Perles de verre; Grille de cuisson; Pierres de lave; Grille porte-bûches; Tuyau de propane; Pare-étincelles; Housse de protection intempéries; Autre
es: Accesorios para brasero incluidos: Kit de herramientas de montaje; Atizador; Regulador de gas; Cuentas de vidrio; Rejilla de parrilla; Rocas de lava; Rejilla para leña; Manguera de propano; Pantalla contra chispas; Funda resistente al clima; Otro
de: Inbegriffenes Feuerstellenzubehör: Montage-Werkzeugpaket; Schürhaken; Gasdruckregler; Glasperlen; Grillrost; Lavasteine; Feuerrost; Propangasschlauch; Funkenschutz; Wetterabdeckung; Sonstige
ko: 화로대 액세서리 포함: 조립 도구 키트; 부지깽이; 가스 조절기; 유리구슬; 그릴 망; 화산석; 장작 받침대; 프로판 호스; 스파크 스크린; 웨더 커버; 기타
da: Bålpladstilbehør medfølger: Værktøjssæt til montering; Ildrager; Gasregulator; Glasperler; Grillrist; Lavasten; Brænderist; Propanslange; Gnistfang; Vejrbestandigt overtræk; Andet
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru vatra de foc: Trusă de scule pentru asamblare; Vătrai; Regulator de gaz; Mărgele de sticlă; Grătar; Roci vulcanice; Suport pentru lemne; Furtun pentru propan; Paravan de protecție împotriva scânteilor; Husă de protecție pentru vreme; Altele
nl: Inbegrepen vuurkorfaccessoires: Montagegereedschapskit; Pook; Gasregelaar; Glaskralen; Grillrooster; Lavastenen; Houtrooster; Propaanslang; Vonkenscherm; Weerbestendige hoes; Overige
fi: Nuotiopaikan mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Asennustyökalupakkaus; Hiilihanko; Kaasusäädin; Lasihelmet; Grilliritilä; Laavakivet; Halkoritilä; Propaaniletku; Kipinäsuoja; Sääsuoja; Muu
sv: Medföljande tillbehör till eldstad: Verktygskit för montering; Eldgaffel; Gasregulator; Glaspärlor; Grillgaller; Lavastenar; Vedgaller; Propanslang; Gnistskydd; Väderskydd; Övrigt
it: Accessori per braciere inclusi: Kit di attrezzi per il montaggio; Attizzatoio; Regolatore del gas; Perle di vetro; Griglia; Rocce laviche; Griglia per ceppi; Tubo per propano; Schermo parascintille; Copertura protettiva; Altro
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm của hố lửa: Bộ dụng cụ lắp ráp; Cây khều lửa; Van điều áp gas; Hạt thủy tinh; Vỉ nướng; Đá nham thạch; Vỉ xếp củi; Ống dẫn khí propane; Lưới chắn tia lửa; Bạt che thời tiết; Khác
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za ložište: Komplet alata za sastavljanje; Žarač; Regulator plina; Staklene perle; Rešetka za roštilj; Kamenje lave; Rešetka za cjepanice; Crijevo za propan; Mreža protiv iskri; Zaštitna navlaka; Ostalo
ja: ファインピットアクセサリー付き: 組み立てツールキット; 火かき棒; ガスレギュレーター; ガラスビーズ; グリル用焼き網; 溶岩石; 薪用ロストル; プロパンホース; スパークスクリーン; ウェザーカバー; その他
zh-TW: 包含火盆配件: 組裝工具包; 撥火棒; 瓦斯調節器; 玻璃珠; 烤網; 火山岩; 柴火架; 丙烷軟管; 擋火花網; 防風雨罩; 其他
tr: Dahil edilen ateş çukuru aksesuarları: Montaj alet kiti; Maşa; Gaz regülatörü; Cam boncuklar; Izgara teli; Lav taşları; Odun ızgarası; Propan hortumu; Kıvılcım teli; Hava koşullarına karşı koruma kılıfı; Diğer
pl: Dołączono akcesoria do paleniska: Zestaw narzędzi montażowych; Pogrzebacz; Reduktor gazowy; Szklane kamyki; Ruszt do grillowania; Kamienie z lawy wulkanicznej; Ruszt na drewno; Wąż do propanu; Pokrywa chroniąca przed iskrami; Pokrowiec ochronny; Inne
pt-PT: Acessórios para lareira exterior incluídos: Kit de ferramentas de montagem; Atiçador de fogo; Regulador de gás; Contas de vidro; Grelha; Rochas vulcânicas; Suporte para lenha; Mangueira de propano; Rede antifaíscas; Capa protetora; Outro
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za odprto kurišče: Komplet orodja za sestavljanje; Grebljica za ogenj; Plinski regulator; Steklene kroglice; Rešetka za žar; Kamni lave; Rešetka za polena; Cev za propan; Mreža proti iskrenju; Zaščitna prevleka; Drugo
hu: Tűzrakóhely tartozékok a csomagban: Összeszerelő szerszámkészlet; Piszkavas; Gáznyomás-szabályozó; Üveggyöngyök; Grillrács; Lávakövek; Tűzifarács; Propántömlő; Szikrafogó háló; Időjárásálló takaróponyva; Egyéb
nb: Inkludert tilbehør til bålgrop: Verktøysett for montering; Ildrake; Gassregulator; Glassperler; Grillrist; Lavasteiner; Vedrist; Propanslange; Gnistfanger; Værtrekk; Annet
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys ugniakuro priedai: Surinkimo įrankių rinkinys; Žarsteklis; Dujų reguliatorius; Stiklo karoliukai; Kepimo grotelės; Lavos akmenys; Malkų grotelės; Propano žarna; Tinklelis nuo kibirkščių; Uždangalas nuo oro sąlygų; Kita